src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!! ----------
!! Adjectives in LATVIAN language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;
zaļš:zaļ A_14ZAĻŠ_ ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
